Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
CHAPTER 10 Trial Judges and Solicitors Retirement Fund

47-10-1 through 47-10-132.
[Reserved]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 2, effective July 1, 1998.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 47-10-61 (Ga. L. 1968, p. 259, § 13), relating to reporting of fees received by solicitors of inferior courts, was repealed by Ga. L. 1990, p. 546, § 3.

Former Code Section 47-10-107 (Ga. L. 1980, p. 1361, § 14 and Ga. L. 1992, p. 1112, § 2), relating to eligibility for election or appointment to state office and practice while receiving retirement benefits, was repealed by Ga. L. 1994, p. 722, § 4.

This chapter consisted of Code Sections 47-10-1 through 47-10-3 (Article 1), 47-10-20 through 47-10-28 (Article 2), 47-10-40, 47-10-41 (Article 3), 47-10-60 through 47-10-66 (Article 4), 47-10-80 through 47-10-82 (Article 5), 47-10-100 through 47-10-108 (Article 6), 47-10-120, 47-10-121 (Article 7), 47-10-130 through 47-10-132 (Article 8), relating to the trial judges and solicitors retirement fund, and was based on Ga. L. 1968, p. 259, §§ 1-10, 12, 14-29, Ga. L. 1969, p. 929, § 1, Ga. L. 1971, p. 335, § 1, Ga. L. 1972, p. 539, §§ 1-3, Ga. L. 1973, p. 788, § 1, Ga. L. 1976, p. 586, §§ 23-25, 27-29, Ga. L. 1978, p. 2173, §§ 20, 21, Ga. L. 1978, p. 2173, § 21, Ga. L. 1980, p. 1361, §§ 1-6, 8-13, Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47, Ga. L. 1982, p. 961, §§ 1, 2 , Ga. L. 1984, p. 1179, §§ 1, 2, Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1, Ga. L. 1987, p. 146, § 1, Ga. L. 1990, p. 546, §§ 1, 2, 4, 5, Ga. L. 1990, p. 550, § 3, Ga. L. 1991, p. 130, § 1, Ga. L. 1992, p. 1112, §§ 1, 3, Ga. L. 1992, p. 1331, § 1, Ga. L. 1992, p. 2102, § 1, Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 13, 14, 18, 19, Ga. L. 1993, p. 803, § 1, Ga. L. 1994, p. 722, § 4, Ga. L. 1995, p. 651, § 6, Ga. L. 1996, p. 377, § 1, Ga. L. 1996, p. 374, § 1, Ga. L. 1997, p. 950, § 1.